Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-734
Contamination; Environmental Quality Council; adopt rules and regulations.

The Environmental Quality Council shall adopt and promulgate, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, such rules and regulations as are necessary to the discharge of duties under sections 46-721 to 46-733.

Laws 1986, LB 894, § 15;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 26;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 46-674.16;

Laws 1996, LB 108, § 54;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 46-656.48;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 74.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.